Nebraska, session 109, LB812.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB812 LB812
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 68-908, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
68-908 (1) The department shall administer the medical assistance
program.
(2) The department may (a) enter into contracts and interagency
agreements, (b) adopt and promulgate rules and regulations, (c) adopt fee
schedules, (d) apply for and implement waivers and managed care plans for
services for eligible recipients, including services under the Nebraska
Behavioral Health Services Act, and (e) perform such other activities as
necessary and appropriate to carry out its duties under the Medical
Assistance Act. A covered item or service as described in section 68-911
that is furnished through a school-based health center, furnished by a
provider, and furnished under a managed care plan pursuant to a waiver
does not require prior consultation or referral by a patient's primary
care physician to be covered. Any federally qualified health center
providing services as a sponsoring facility of a school-based health
center shall be reimbursed for such services provided at a school-based
health center at the federally qualified health center reimbursement
rate.
(3) The department shall maintain the confidentiality of information
regarding applicants for or recipients of medical assistance and such
information shall only be used for purposes related to administration of
the medical assistance program and the provision of such assistance or as
otherwise permitted by federal law.
(4) The department shall prepare an annual summary and analysis of
the medical assistance program for legislative and public review. The
department shall submit a report of such summary and analysis to the
Governor and the Legislature electronically no later than December 1 of
each year. The annual summary shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) The number and percentage of applications approved and denied;
(b) The number of eligibility determinations, including the number
-2-

LB812 LB812
2026 2026
and percentage of those individuals remaining enrolled, terminations, and
other determinations;
(c) The number of case closures in the medical assistance program
and the Children's Health Insurance Program and the specific reason for
the closure broken down by (i) eligibility category, including program
type, (ii) local public health district or other geographic area, and
(iii) race or ethnicity, if available;
(d) The number of medical assistance program and Children's Health
Insurance Program enrollees broken down by (i) eligibility category,
including program type, (ii) local public health district or other
geographic area, and (iii) race or ethnicity, if available;
(e) The number and percentage of redeterminations or renewals
processed ex parte, broken down by (i) eligibility category, including
program type and (ii) race or ethnicity, if available;
(f) The average number of days required to process applications for
the medical assistance program and Children's Health Insurance Program,
separating the data by applicants with modified adjusted gross income and
nonmodified adjusted gross income eligibility;
(g) The rate of re-enrollment within ninety days of termination and
within twelve months of termination, broken down by (i) eligibility
category, including program type, (ii) local public health district or
other geographic area, and (iii) race or ethnicity, if available;
(h) The average client call duration;
(i) The client call abandonment rate;
(j) The number of requests for a fair hearing separated by (i)
eligibility category and program type, (ii) outcome, and (iii) amount of
time until final disposition; and
(k) A link to the medical assistance program fair hearing decisions
that have been redacted to protect private and health information, which
shall be posted on the department's website.
(5)(a) The department shall redetermine eligibility for the medical
-3-

LB812 LB812
2026 2026
assistance program no more frequently than required by 42 U.S.C. 1396a(e)
(14)(L), as such section existed on January 1, 2026.
(b) The department shall implement community engagement requirements
for the medical assistance program only as required by 42 U.S.C.
1396a(xx), as such section existed on January 1, 2026, and the department
shall:
(i) Implement community engagement requirements no earlier than the
date required by 42 U.S.C. 1396a(xx), as such section existed on January
1, 2026, or by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services,
whichever is later;
(ii) Require no more than one month of compliance with, or exemption
from, the community engagement requirements for (A) applicants for
medical assistance; and (B) enrollees since the most recent application
or renewal; and
(iii) Verify community engagement requirement compliance or
exemption status only at redetermination of eligibility and not more
frequently than once every six months.
Sec. 2. Original section 68-908, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
Sec. 3. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-4-